src/morphology/hacks/tagger-hacks.lexc
LEXICON TAGGER_HACKS
[WORD_ID=1%0%0%0%0-litraisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:01%0%0%0%0-litraisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=1%0%0%0-kertaiseksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:01%0%0%0-kertaiseksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=1%0%0%0-paikkaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:01%0%0%0-paikkaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=1%0%0-kertainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:01%0%0-kertainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=1%0%0-kertaisessa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:01%0%0-kertaisessa	#	;
[WORD_ID=1%0-kertainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:01%0-kertainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=1%0-kertaiseksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:01%0-kertaiseksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=1%0-kertaista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:01%0-kertaista	#	;
[WORD_ID=1%0-napaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:01%0-napaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=1%0-vuotiaista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:01%0-vuotiaista	#	;
[WORD_ID=1%0-vuotiasta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:01%0-vuotiasta	#	;
[WORD_ID=12-asteista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:012-asteista	#	;
[WORD_ID=12-kuukautisessa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:012-kuukautisessa	#	;
[WORD_ID=12-vuotiaalle][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:012-vuotiaalle	#	;
[WORD_ID=12-vuotiaiden][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:012-vuotiaiden	#	;
[WORD_ID=12-vuotiaita][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:012-vuotiaita	#	;
[WORD_ID=13-vaiheista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:013-vaiheista	#	;
[WORD_ID=13-vuotiaat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:013-vuotiaat	#	;
[WORD_ID=13-vuotiaille][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:013-vuotiaille	#	;
[WORD_ID=13-vuotiailta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:013-vuotiailta	#	;
[WORD_ID=13-vuotiaista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:013-vuotiaista	#	;
[WORD_ID=145-paikkainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0145-paikkainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=14-vuotiaiden][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:014-vuotiaiden	#	;
[WORD_ID=14-vuotiailta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:014-vuotiailta	#	;
[WORD_ID=14-vuotiaita][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:014-vuotiaita	#	;
[WORD_ID=14-vuotias][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:014-vuotias	#	;
[WORD_ID=15-jäseniseen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:015-jäseniseen	#	;
[WORD_ID=15-jäsenisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:015-jäsenisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=15-jäsenisessä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:015-jäsenisessä	#	;
[WORD_ID=15-kohtaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:015-kohtaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=15-vuotiaat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:015-vuotiaat	#	;
[WORD_ID=15-vuotiaiden][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:015-vuotiaiden	#	;
[WORD_ID=15-vuotiaista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:015-vuotiaista	#	;
[WORD_ID=15-vuotiaita][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:015-vuotiaita	#	;
[WORD_ID=15-vuotias][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:015-vuotias	#	;
[WORD_ID=15-vuotisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:015-vuotisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=16-kertainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:016-kertainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=16-kertaiseksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:016-kertaiseksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=16-kertaisella][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:016-kertaisella	#	;
[WORD_ID=16-vuotiaat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:016-vuotiaat	#	;
[WORD_ID=16-vuotiaiden][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:016-vuotiaiden	#	;
[WORD_ID=16-vuotiailta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:016-vuotiailta	#	;
[WORD_ID=16-vuotiaista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:016-vuotiaista	#	;
[WORD_ID=16-vuotiaita][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:016-vuotiaita	#	;
[WORD_ID=16-vuotias][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:016-vuotias	#	;
[WORD_ID=17-vuotiaat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:017-vuotiaat	#	;
[WORD_ID=17-vuotiaille][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:017-vuotiaille	#	;
[WORD_ID=18-asteista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:018-asteista	#	;
[WORD_ID=18-kuukautisessa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:018-kuukautisessa	#	;
[WORD_ID=18-kuukautiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:018-kuukautiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=18-kuukautista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:018-kuukautista	#	;
[WORD_ID=18-vuotiaalle][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:018-vuotiaalle	#	;
[WORD_ID=18-vuotiaasta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:018-vuotiaasta	#	;
[WORD_ID=18-vuotiaat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:018-vuotiaat	#	;
[WORD_ID=18-vuotiaiden][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:018-vuotiaiden	#	;
[WORD_ID=18-vuotiaille][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:018-vuotiaille	#	;
[WORD_ID=18-vuotiailta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:018-vuotiailta	#	;
[WORD_ID=18-vuotiaisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:018-vuotiaisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=18-vuotiaita][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:018-vuotiaita	#	;
[WORD_ID=18-vuotias][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:018-vuotias	#	;
[WORD_ID=18-vuotiasta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:018-vuotiasta	#	;
[WORD_ID=19-sivuinen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:019-sivuinen	#	;
[WORD_ID=1-kuukautisella][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:01-kuukautisella	#	;
[WORD_ID=1-vuotiaat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:01-vuotiaat	#	;
[WORD_ID=1-vuotias][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:01-vuotias	#	;
[WORD_ID=2%0%0-kertaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:02%0%0-kertaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=2%0-asteisella][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:02%0-asteisella	#	;
[WORD_ID=2%0-kertainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:02%0-kertainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=2%0-kertaisella][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:02%0-kertaisella	#	;
[WORD_ID=2%0-paikkaisilla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:02%0-paikkaisilla	#	;
[WORD_ID=2%0-vuotiaiden][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:02%0-vuotiaiden	#	;
[WORD_ID=2%0-vuotiaita][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:02%0-vuotiaita	#	;
[WORD_ID=21-vuotiaalla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:021-vuotiaalla	#	;
[WORD_ID=21-vuotiaiden][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:021-vuotiaiden	#	;
[WORD_ID=21-vuotiailla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:021-vuotiailla	#	;
[WORD_ID=21-vuotiaille][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:021-vuotiaille	#	;
[WORD_ID=21-vuotiailta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:021-vuotiailta	#	;
[WORD_ID=21-vuotiaita][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:021-vuotiaita	#	;
[WORD_ID=21-vuotias][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:021-vuotias	#	;
[WORD_ID=22-vuotiaiden][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:022-vuotiaiden	#	;
[WORD_ID=22-vuotiaista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:022-vuotiaista	#	;
[WORD_ID=23-renkaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:023-renkaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=23-renkaisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:023-renkaisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=23-renkaisista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:023-renkaisista	#	;
[WORD_ID=23-renkaisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:023-renkaisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=25%0-asteista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:025%0-asteista	#	;
[WORD_ID=25-jäseninen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:025-jäseninen	#	;
[WORD_ID=25-jäseniseen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:025-jäseniseen	#	;
[WORD_ID=25-jäseniseksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:025-jäseniseksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=25-jäsenisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:025-jäsenisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=25-jäsenisessä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:025-jäsenisessä	#	;
[WORD_ID=25-kertaiseen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:025-kertaiseen	#	;
[WORD_ID=25-kertaiseksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:025-kertaiseksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=25-kertaisiksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:025-kertaisiksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=25-vuotiaat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:025-vuotiaat	#	;
[WORD_ID=25-vuotiaiden][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:025-vuotiaiden	#	;
[WORD_ID=25-vuotiaita][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:025-vuotiaita	#	;
[WORD_ID=25-vuotias][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:025-vuotias	#	;
[WORD_ID=25-vuotiasta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:025-vuotiasta	#	;
[WORD_ID=26-kertaiseksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:026-kertaiseksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=26-vuotiaana][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:026-vuotiaana	#	;
[WORD_ID=26-vuotiaat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:026-vuotiaat	#	;
[WORD_ID=26-vuotiaille][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:026-vuotiaille	#	;
[WORD_ID=27-jäseniseksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:027-jäseniseksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=27-jäsenisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:027-jäsenisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=27-jäsenisessä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:027-jäsenisessä	#	;
[WORD_ID=27-vuotiaat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:027-vuotiaat	#	;
[WORD_ID=27-vuotiaita][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:027-vuotiaita	#	;
[WORD_ID=28-kertaiseksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:028-kertaiseksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=2-kertainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:02-kertainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=2-kertaista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:02-kertaista	#	;
[WORD_ID=2-kirjaiminen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:02-kirjaiminen	#	;
[WORD_ID=2-napainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:02-napainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=2-paikkainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:02-paikkainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=2-vuotiaat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:02-vuotiaat	#	;
[WORD_ID=2-vuotiaille][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:02-vuotiaille	#	;
[WORD_ID=3%05-päiväiseen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:03%05-päiväiseen	#	;
[WORD_ID=3%08-paikkainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:03%08-paikkainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=3%0-jäseninen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:03%0-jäseninen	#	;
[WORD_ID=3%0-kertainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:03%0-kertainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=3%0-päiväisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:03%0-päiväisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=3%0-vuotiaisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:03%0-vuotiaisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=3%0-vuotiaita][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:03%0-vuotiaita	#	;
[WORD_ID=3%0-vuotisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:03%0-vuotisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=33-tavuinen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:033-tavuinen	#	;
[WORD_ID=35-vuotiaalla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:035-vuotiaalla	#	;
[WORD_ID=35-vuotiaat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:035-vuotiaat	#	;
[WORD_ID=35-vuotiaiden][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:035-vuotiaiden	#	;
[WORD_ID=35-vuotiaille][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:035-vuotiaille	#	;
[WORD_ID=36-vuotiaiden][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:036-vuotiaiden	#	;
[WORD_ID=39-jäseninen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:039-jäseninen	#	;
[WORD_ID=3-akseliset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:03-akseliset	#	;
[WORD_ID=3-kirjaiminen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:03-kirjaiminen	#	;
[WORD_ID=3-vaihteisella][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:03-vaihteisella	#	;
[WORD_ID=3-vaihteiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:03-vaihteiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=3-vuotiaat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:03-vuotiaat	#	;
[WORD_ID=3-vuotiaiden][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:03-vuotiaiden	#	;
[WORD_ID=3-vuotiaille][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:03-vuotiaille	#	;
[WORD_ID=3-vuotiaista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:03-vuotiaista	#	;
[WORD_ID=3-vuotiaita][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:03-vuotiaita	#	;
[WORD_ID=3-vuotiasta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:03-vuotiasta	#	;
[WORD_ID=3-vuotiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:03-vuotiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=4%0%0-kertainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:04%0%0-kertainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=4%0-asteiseen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:04%0-asteiseen	#	;
[WORD_ID=4%0-asteisella][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:04%0-asteisella	#	;
[WORD_ID=4%0-jalkaisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:04%0-jalkaisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=4%0-kertainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:04%0-kertainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=4%0-kertaisella][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:04%0-kertaisella	#	;
[WORD_ID=4%0-vuotiaiden][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:04%0-vuotiaiden	#	;
[WORD_ID=4%0-vuotiaille][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:04%0-vuotiaille	#	;
[WORD_ID=4%0-vuotiaita][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:04%0-vuotiaita	#	;
[WORD_ID=4%0-vuotias][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:04%0-vuotias	#	;
[WORD_ID=45%0-paikkaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:045%0-paikkaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=45-vuotiasta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:045-vuotiasta	#	;
[WORD_ID=48-jäseninen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:048-jäseninen	#	;
[WORD_ID=48-paikkaisella][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:048-paikkaisella	#	;
[WORD_ID=48-tuntista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:048-tuntista	#	;
[WORD_ID=4-akseliset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:04-akseliset	#	;
